California statutes. Education Code
(b) The California Community Colleges Agriculture and Natural Resources Advisory Committee shall perform all of the activities specified in subdivision (a) within the allotment of funding provided to the advisory committee under the federal Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Technical Education Act (VTEA). Under no circumstances shall these activities result in a state operations request for General Fund support or displace any other VTEA-funded state operations activities within the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.4. Vocational Education Coordination Plan [78018. - 78018.]

78018.

(a) As a condition of federal funds provided under the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Act of 1998 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.) or any successor thereof, and to the extent permitted by federal law, a community college shall develop a plan for enabling the development of course sequences that span courses provided in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, courses provided by regional occupational centers or programs, and courses provided by community college vocational education programs. The community college shall consult with the school districts and regional occupational centers or programs in the area served by the college, and with the relevant local workforce investment board, in the development of the plan. The plan shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the occupational areas in which the college and high schools or regional occupational centers and programs offer instruction.

(2) Describe the plan the community college will follow to create the sequences required under subdivision (c) of Section 52302.

(3) Establish an institutionwide process and criteria for awarding community college credit for vocational courses taken by pupils in high school or through the regional occupational center or program.

(b) The plan shall be adopted by the governing board of the community college district on or before July 1, 2008. Copies of the plan shall be submitted to the appropriate school districts and regional occupational centers or programs, and the chancellor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Contract Education [78020. - 78023.]

78020.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Contract education” means those situations in which a community college district contracts with a public or private entity for the purposes of providing instruction or services or both by the community college.

(b) “Credit” refers to any class offered for community college credit, regardless of whether the class generates state apportionments.

(c) “Noncredit” refers to courses that meet the criteria for apportionment pursuant to Section 84757.

(d) “Not-for-credit” refers to classes, including community services classes, that are offered without credit and that are not eligible for apportionments pursuant to Section 84757.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 16.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

78021.

(a) The governing board of any community college district may establish, or with one or more community college districts may establish, contract education programs within or outside the state by agreement with any public or private agency, corporation, association, or any other person or body, to provide specific educational programs or training to meet the specific needs of these bodies.

(b) The contracting community college district or districts shall recover, from all revenue sources, including, but not necessarily limited to, public and private sources, or any combination thereof, an amount equal to, but not less than, the actual costs, including administrative costs, incurred in providing these programs or training.

(c) The attendance of students in these contract education programs shall not be included for purposes of calculating the full-time equivalent students (FTES) for apportionments to these districts, unless all statutory and regulatory conditions for generating FTES are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 17.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

78022.

(a) Faculty in all credit and noncredit contract education classes shall be selected and hired according to procedures existing in a community college district for the selection of instructors for credit classes.

(b) Faculty teaching credit and noncredit contract education classes shall be compensated in the same manner as comparable faculty in the regular, noncontract education program. This subdivision does not apply to faculty teaching in contract education programs conducted outside California for the United States armed forces, unless the faculty member is covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

(c) Faculty teaching credit or noncredit contract education classes shall be evaluated according to the procedures used for the evaluation of faculty in the regular, noncontract education program.

(d) Faculty teaching not-for-credit contract education classes shall be compensated in the same manner as faculty in the regular, noncontract education program if the course meets the same standards as a course in the credit curriculum. This subdivision does not apply to faculty teaching in contract education programs conducted outside California for the United States armed forces, unless the faculty member is covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

(e) Faculty teaching not-for-credit contract educational programs shall be evaluated according to procedures specified in the contract between the community college district and the public or private entity to establish the program.

(f) This section shall not be construed to restrict the appearance of guest lecturers in any programs or classes operated by a community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

78023.

(a) Nonprofit public benefit corporations that are not organized as auxiliary organizations pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 72670) of Chapter 6 of Part 45 and are conducting contract education programs shall not use the name of a community college district or of a college of a community college district.

(b) A nonprofit public benefit corporation that is not organized as an auxiliary organization pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 72670) of Chapter 6 of Part 45 and is conducting contract education programs shall not employ the resources and staff of a community college district without full compensation for all related costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 493, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Interdistrict Attendance [78030. - 78034.]

78030.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) Many community college students desire to attend, and do attend, community colleges outside their district of residence.

(2) Prior to the passage of Proposition 13, interdistrict attendance restrictions were necessary to provide for payments from the district of residence to a district of attendance whenever significant numbers of students were involved.

(3) The fact that community colleges are now substantially reliant upon the state for financial resources rather than upon local residents compels a reexamination of the concern over subsidization of the attendance of nondistrict residents.

(4) Community college district boundaries are often irregular in configuration and require many students to attend community colleges in less convenient locations when interdistrict attendance restrictions are imposed.

(5) Transportation is the most significant cost facing community college students with regard to college attendance.

(6) It is not in the best interests of the people of the State of California that attendance at a community college be restricted to a person’s district of residence.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to provide for the unrestricted enrollment and attendance of students at community colleges, thereby providing each resident of the state an equal opportunity to attend the community college of his or her choice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1136, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

78031.

(a) Subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 76000) of Chapter 1 of Part 47, a district resident, as defined for purposes of Part 41 (commencing with Section 68000), shall be admitted to a community college in another district without regard to district boundaries, unless the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges finds that compelling, extenuating circumstances exist under which the application of this policy would be substantially detrimental to the opportunity of students to obtain a quality education.

(b) No district shall restrict the admission of its residents into a community college of another district, nor shall it restrict the admission of residents of another district into its community college or colleges, except as authorized under Section 78032.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

78032.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges may, pursuant to a finding that one or more of the following concerns in any community college district requires the restriction of interdistrict attendance, impose one or more restrictions upon interdistrict attendance with regard to that district as it deems necessary:

(1) Protection of the financial health of the district, and of educational program integrity, including, but not limited to, maintenance of the appropriate quality and scope of student educational opportunity.

(2) The need to avoid overcrowding, in light of the available space in the district.

(3) The priority that resident students not be displaced by students who do not reside in the district.

(b) No restriction adopted under subdivision (a) shall apply for a period of longer than two years, absent additional action of the board of governors to continue that restriction.

(c) (1) No community college district shall recruit any student who is a resident of any other community college district, except where an agreement exists between those districts authorizing each district to recruit within the boundaries of the other district.

(2) If, pursuant to an agreement as described in paragraph (1), a community college district recruits within the boundaries of another community college district, it shall recruit from all high schools within that other district, and may not favor any high schools over other high schools within that other district.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(A) “Recruiting” means either or both of the following actions by a community college district, where the apparent purpose is to encourage student attendance in that district:

(i) The mailing by a community college district, to any address not within its boundaries, of class schedules or other written information, except to current or former students of the district or at the addressee’s request.

(ii) The personal visit by a representative of the community college district to any high school, except in response to an invitation from the school district of which the high school is a part.

(B) “Recruiting” does not include any information provided by a community college district through radio, television, or any newspaper or other publication that is not published or otherwise issued by the district, and for which distribution is not limited to residents of the district.

(d) The board of governors shall authorize the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to retain in any fiscal year an amount of up to 5 percent of the appropriation calculated under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 84700) of Part 50 as a penalty applicable to any community college district that violates this article, including, but not necessarily limited to, any restriction imposed by the board of governors under this section. Any funds retained pursuant to this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 18.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

78033.

Nothing in this act shall abrogate any contract existing between any school districts on the effective date of this chapter. Any contractual provision in any contract in effect on the effective date of this chapter shall prevail over any conflicting provision in this chapter until the termination date of the contract, or upon termination by mutual agreement of the parties, whichever occurs first.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1136, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

78034.

(a) In addition to classification as a resident pursuant to Section 68040, each community college student shall be classified as either a district resident or a nondistrict resident.

(b) For purposes of classification as a district resident or nondistrict resident, the following definitions shall be applicable:

(1) “District” means a community college district maintaining one or more community colleges.

(2) “District resident” means a resident who has residence within a district in the state.

(3) “Nondistrict resident” means a resident who does not have residence within a district in the state, or means a student who: (A) within a 39-month period immediately preceding the residence determination date, was graduated from a high school which is situated in territory not within a district, and (B) whose parent or parents reside in this territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 456.2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Baccalaureate Degree Program [78040. - 78043.]

78040.

For purposes of this article, “district” means any community college district identified by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges as participating in the statewide baccalaureate degree program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 565, Sec. 2.   (AB 927)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78041.

Notwithstanding Section 66010.4, and commencing January 1, 2015, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, in consultation with the California State University and the University of California, may authorize the establishment of district baccalaureate degree programs that meet all of the eligibility requirements set forth in Section 78042.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 565, Sec. 3.   (AB 927)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78042.

(a) A district shall seek approval to offer baccalaureate degree programs through the appropriate accreditation body.

(b) When seeking approval from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, a district shall maintain the primary mission of the California Community Colleges specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 66010.4. The district, as part of the baccalaureate degree program, shall have the additional mission to provide high-quality undergraduate education at an affordable price for students and the state.

(c) As a condition of eligibility for consideration to participate in the
 statewide baccalaureate degree program, a district shall have a written policy that requires all potential students who wish to apply for a Board of Governors Fee Waiver pursuant to Section 76300 to complete and submit either a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or a California Dream Act application in lieu of completing the Board of Governors Fee Waiver application.

(d) A district’s baccalaureate degree program shall be subject to the following limitations:

(1) A district shall identify and document unmet workforce needs in the subject area of the baccalaureate degree to be offered and offer a baccalaureate degree at a campus in a subject area with unmet workforce needs in the local community or region of the district.

(2) A baccalaureate degree program shall not offer a baccalaureate degree program or program curricula already offered by the California State University or the University of California.

(3) A district shall have the expertise, resources, and student interest to offer a quality baccalaureate degree in the chosen field of study.

(e) A district shall maintain separate records for students who are enrolled in courses classified in the upper division and lower division of a baccalaureate degree program. A student shall be reported as a community college student for enrollment in a lower division course and as a baccalaureate degree program student for enrollment in an upper division course.

(f) A governing board of
 a district seeking authorization to offer a baccalaureate degree program shall submit all of the following for review by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and approval by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges:

(1) Documentation of the district’s written policy required by subdivision (c).

(2) The administrative plan for the baccalaureate degree program, including, but not limited to, the governing board of the district’s funding plan for its specific district.

(3) A description of the baccalaureate degree program’s curriculum, faculty, and facilities.

(4) The enrollment projections for the baccalaureate degree program.

(5) Documentation regarding unmet workforce needs specifically related to the proposed baccalaureate degree program, and a written statement supporting the necessity of a four-year degree for that program. The documentation regarding unmet workforce needs shall include all of the following:

(A) Evidence that the district consulted with regional employers and regional workforce development boards.

(B) Statewide and regional workforce data relevant to the proposed baccalaureate degree program.

(C) Evidence that the baccalaureate degree to be offered will help address unmet workforce needs. The evidence may include, but is not limited to, information showing the
 following:

(i) Employers are having difficulty filling positions that require a baccalaureate degree.

(ii) Employers are willing to pay baccalaureate degree holders more than those with a related associate degree or no postsecondary degree.

(iii) Employers have a preference for candidates with the proposed baccalaureate degree.

(6) Documentation of consultation with the California State University and the University of California regarding collaborative approaches to meeting regional workforce needs.

(g) (1) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall
 develop, and adopt by regulation, a funding model for the support of the statewide baccalaureate degree program that is based on a calculation of the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in all district baccalaureate degree programs.

(2) Funding for each full-time equivalent student shall be at a marginal cost calculation, as determined by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, that shall not exceed the community college credit instruction marginal cost calculation for a full-time equivalent student, as determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5.

(3) A student in a baccalaureate degree program authorized by this article shall not be charged fees higher than the mandatory systemwide fees charged for baccalaureate degree
 programs at the California State University.

(4) Fees for coursework in a baccalaureate degree program shall be consistent with Article 1 (commencing with Section 76300) of Chapter 2 of Part 47.

(5) A district shall, in addition to the fees charged pursuant to paragraph (4), charge a fee for upper division coursework in a baccalaureate degree program of eighty-four dollars ($84) per unit.

(h) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall ensure all of the following for the application and review process for community college districts to participate in the baccalaureate degree program:

(1) A community college district is provided with two
 timelines in which to apply for a baccalaureate degree program per year. A community college district may submit an application to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges by no later than January 15 and shall receive notice of approval or rejection on or before May 31. A community college district may submit an application to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges by no later than August 15 and shall receive notice of approval or rejection on or before December 31.

(2) Only 15 baccalaureate degree programs are approved during each application period, allowing for a total of 30 approved baccalaureate degree programs per academic year.

(3) The total number of baccalaureate degree programs offered by a community college district, at any time, does not exceed 25 percent
 of the total number of associate degree programs offered by the community college district, including associate degrees for transfer.

(4) The review process takes no less than 30 days from the receipt of a completed application to validate the information submitted and assess the workforce value of the proposed program by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(i) (1) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with and seek feedback from the Chancellor of the California State University, the President of the University of
 California, and the President of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities about proposed baccalaureate degree programs.

(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall notify and send relevant materials to the California State University, the University of California, and the President of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities who may notify institutions with physical campuses in the service area of the community college
 district seeking the proposed baccalaureate degree program.

(3) The California State University and the University of California may assess whether proposed baccalaureate degree programs are duplicative of existing baccalaureate programs offered by state universities, and may submit written comments to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges regarding proposed baccalaureate degree programs. If the California State University or the University of California believes there is program duplication, written objections with supporting evidence shall be submitted to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges within 30 working days of receipt of the proposal. Upon receipt of written objections, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall have 30 working days to convene with the applicant and
 the segment or segments that raised an objection to collaborate and establish a written agreement before the program is approved.

(4) A formal objection filed by either the California State University or the University of California pursuant to paragraph (3) shall address, at a minimum, each of the following issues in order to facilitate the consultation process:

(A) The name and description of the baccalaureate degree program currently offered by the objecting segment that may be duplicated by the proposed baccalaureate degree program, including the campuses that offer the program.

(B) The specific components of the proposed baccalaureate degree program deemed as duplicative.

(5) The written agreement established between the objecting segment and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall
 address, at a minimum, whether each of the elements of the original objection addressed in paragraph (4) have been resolved.

(j) (1) A community college district shall continue to offer an associate degree program in the same academic subject for which a baccalaureate degree program has been approved, unless that community college district has received approval from the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to eliminate the associate degree program.

(2) When conducting a review to approve the elimination of an associate degree program, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall evaluate both of the following:

(A) Changes to the labor market viability of the associate
 degree.

(B) Changes to the minimum education required to maintain program accreditation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 565, Sec. 4.   (AB 927)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78043.

Baccalaureate degree programs approved by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to this article before January 1, 2022, may continue to operate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 565, Sec. 6.   (AB 927)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Zero-Textbook-Cost Degree Grant Program [78050. - 78052.]

78050.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Zero-Textbook-Cost Degree Grant Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 16.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

78051.

The Zero-Textbook-Cost Degree Grant Program is hereby established to reduce the overall cost of education for students and decrease the time it takes students to complete degree programs offered by community colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 16.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

78052.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that community college districts develop and implement zero-textbook-cost degrees and develop open educational resources for courses to reduce the overall cost of education for students and decrease the time it takes students to complete degree programs.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the
 office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(3) “Degree” means a zero-textbook-cost degree.

(4) “Open educational resources” means high-quality teaching, learning, and research resources that reside in the public domain or have been released pursuant to an intellectual property license that permits their free use and repurposing by others, and may include other resources that are legally available and free of cost to students. Open educational resources include, but are not limited to, full courses, course materials, modules, textbooks, faculty-created content, streaming videos, tests, software, and any other tools, materials, or techniques used to support access to knowledge.

(5) “Zero-textbook-cost degrees” means community college associate degrees or
 career technical education certificates earned entirely by completing courses that eliminate conventional textbook costs by using alternative instructional materials and methodologies, including open educational resources. For purposes of this paragraph, “zero-textbook-cost degrees” may include a low-cost degree option if a no-cost equivalent option is not available or cannot be developed. Discretionary student printing of instructional materials shall not be considered a cost as part of this program.

(c) Of the funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act to develop and implement degrees, the chancellor shall distribute grants of up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to a community college district for each degree developed and implemented within the district that contributes to the overall elimination, or significant lowering, of textbook costs for students and aligns with the conditions for receipt of funds specified in subdivision
 (d). The chancellor’s office shall ensure that a grant does not result in the development or implementation of duplicate degrees for a subject matter to avoid duplication of effort and ensure the development and implementation of the greatest number of degrees for the benefit of the greatest number of students. The chancellor’s office may distribute the grants in phases, including a planning phase and an implementation phase.

(d) As a condition of receiving funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act to develop and implement degrees, a community college district shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Develop and implement one or more of the following program pathways:

(A) An existing associate degree or career technical education certificate program, prioritizing existing associate degrees for transfer.

(B) A new associate degree or career technical education certificate program that meets one of the following conditions:

(i) Has a high value in the regional market.

(ii) Meets an emerging regional business industry need.

(iii) Has high textbook costs.

(2) In complying with paragraph (1), prioritize the development and implementation of a degree from an existing associate degree for transfer and, to the extent possible, prioritize the adaptation of existing open educational resources through existing open educational resources initiatives, or elsewhere, before creating new content.

(3) Develop degrees with consideration for
 sustainability after grant funding is exhausted, including how content is updated and presented.

(4) Ensure compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (Public Law 104-197) and the federal Copyright Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-553).

(5) Develop and implement a minimum of one degree for each grant received.

(6) Develop and implement a degree that other community college districts can use or adapt, and post each degree, and the contents of the degree, on the online clearinghouse of information established pursuant to Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2016, or a successor internet website. All open educational resources used as learning materials for a degree developed pursuant to this section shall be added to the California Digital Open Source Library established in Section 66408. Testing and
 assessment materials posted online pursuant to this paragraph shall be safeguarded to maintain the integrity of those materials. This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit faculty from providing sample test and assessment materials to students.

(7) Ensure faculty shall have flexibility to update and customize degree content as necessary within the parameters of this program.

(8) Ensure that the degree developed and implemented is clearly identified in college catalogs and in class schedules.

(9) Provide the chancellor with all legislatively required report data, any planning, progress, and outcome information associated with the grant, and any additional information that the chancellor determines necessary.

(10) Consult with the local academic
 senate of a college that would implement a degree.

(11) (A) Use a multimember team approach, to develop and implement a degree pursuant to this section, that includes faculty, college administrators, and other content-focused staff, including, but not limited to, librarians, instructional designers, and technology experts, from the campus that would implement the degree, other colleges of the community college system, and interested campuses of the California State University and the University of California.

(B) Grant recipients may use funds to obtain professional development and technical assistance to assist in the development of
 degrees and open educational resource materials.

(12) Strive to implement degrees within three academic years of receiving funding, or sooner, as determined by the chancellor’s office.

(e) Of the funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act, the chancellor may also distribute grants to a community college district for the development and curation of open educational resources for coursework. The chancellor’s office shall determine the amount of a grant for this purpose, but the grant amount shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(f) As a condition of receiving funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the development and curation of open educational resources for coursework, a community college district shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Coordinate the development and curation of open educational resources with efforts to develop and implement degrees pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) In instances where the community college district does not receive a grant pursuant to subdivision (c), the community college district shall coordinate the development and curation of open educational resources with existing open educational resources initiatives and degree efforts. In addition, the community college district shall develop and curate open educational resources for coursework to be used for one or more of the following program pathways:

(A) An existing associate degree or career technical education certificate program, prioritizing existing associate degrees for transfer.

(B) A new
 associate degree or career technical education certificate program that meets one of the following conditions:

(i) Has high value in the regional market.

(ii) Meets an emerging regional business industry need.

(iii) Has high textbook costs.

(3) In complying with paragraph (2), to the extent possible, prioritize the adaptation of existing open educational resources for coursework through existing open educational resources initiatives, or elsewhere, before creating new content.

(4) Ensure compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (Public Law 104-197) and the federal Copyright Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-553).

(5) Ensure all open educational resources developed pursuant to this subdivision is added to the California Digital Open Source Library established in Section 66408.

(6) Provide the chancellor with all required report data and any planning, progress, and outcome information associated with the grant.

(7) (A) Consult with the local academic senate of a community college that would use open educational resources.

(B) Grant recipients may use funds to obtain professional development and technical assistance to assist in the development and curation of open educational resources for coursework.

(8) Strive to complete development and curation of open educational resources for coursework within two academic years of
 receiving funding, or sooner, as determined by the chancellor’s office.

(g) (1) The chancellor shall, by June 30, 2027, report to the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the development and implementation of degrees pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d), and the development and curation of open educational resources pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f), including, but not limited to:

(A) The number of degrees developed and implemented and open educational resources developed and curated within each district, disaggregated by college. Degrees shall also be disaggregated by the number of degrees that eliminated textbook costs and the number of degrees that significantly lowered textbook costs.

(B) The estimated annual savings to students.

(C) The number of students who completed a zero-textbook-cost degree program and accessed open educational resources.

(D) Recommendations to increase, expand, or improve the offering of degrees and the use of open educational resources.

(2) A report pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) (1) Of the funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this program, up to 3 percent of the appropriation may be allocated by the chancellor’s office to contract with a community college district to administer this program.

(2) The contract between the chancellor’s office and the community college
 district shall reflect all of the following:

(A) The programmatic and administrative responsibilities that will be delegated to the district, including the programmatic requirements identified in subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive.

(B) A requirement that the contracting district provide prebid conferences, either in person or via webinar, for interested grant applicants.

(C) Technical assistance to grant applicants and grantees.

(3) The contracting community college district may apply for, and receive, a grant to develop and implement a degree and have employees and administrators of the district participate as part of a multimember team approach pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (d). To be eligible to receive a grant, the district shall
 maintain appropriate and transparent internal controls and processes to ensure that the district’s contracted duties and responsibilities are clearly delineated, identified, and distinguished from the duties and responsibilities conferred upon the district as a grant applicant and recipient.

(4) Upon request of the chancellor’s office, the contracted community college district shall provide the chancellor’s office with an update on the status of the development and implementation of each degree within the district and the development and curation of open educational resources within the district.

(5) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract between the chancellor’s office and a community college district for purposes of this subdivision is not subject to any competitive bidding requirements of Section 10340 of the Public Contract Code for the limited purpose of administering the
 program pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) Of the funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this program, funds not awarded in a fiscal year for which funds are appropriated may be awarded in the following fiscal year.

(j) The chancellor’s office shall award an initial round of grants no later than January 1 of a fiscal year for which the funds are appropriated.

(k) The chancellor’s office may allocate any unallocated resources appropriated for purposes of this program, on or after June 30, 2025, to a community college district to contract for the establishment of statewide open educational resources infrastructure, including the curation, storage, and maintenance of open educational resources infrastructure materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 745, Sec. 5.   (SB 148)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. California Community College Teacher Credentialing Partnership Pilot Act [78060. - 78061.]

78060.

This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Community College Teacher Credentialing Partnership Pilot Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 603, Sec. 3.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

78061.

(a) The California Community College Teacher Credentialing Partnership Pilot Program is hereby established for both of the following purposes:

(1) To encourage accredited degree-granting institutions of higher education with a physical presence in this state to collaborate with one or more community colleges to offer teacher credentialing coursework remotely at the participating community college or colleges.

(2) To bring opportunities to earn teacher credentialing degrees to areas with low college-going rates or limited access to teacher-credentialing, degree-granting higher education institutions.
